District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Department of Energy and Environment Definitions Clarification
Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 101(27A) of the Retail Electric Competition and Consumer Protection Act
of 1999, effective May 9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-107; D.C. Official Code § 34-1501(27A)), is
amended by striking the phrase “Columbia law that owns” and inserting the phrase “Columbia
law, or government entity, that owns” in its place.
Sec. 3. Section 2(20) of the Lead-Hazard Prevention and Elimination Act of 2008,
effective March 31, 2009 (D.C. Law 17-381; D.C. Official Code § 8-231.01(20)), is amended by
striking the phrase “(0.7 µg/cm²)” and inserting the phrase “(0.7 mg/cm²)” in its place.
Sec. 4. Section 128(11)(A) of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act
of 2014, effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-211; D.C. Official Code § 8-771.01(11)(A)), is
amended by striking the phrase “who manufacturers a” and inserting the phrase “who
manufactures a” in its place.
Sec. 5. Applicability.
(a) Section 2 shall apply as of December 13, 2013.
(b) Section 3 shall apply as of March 16, 2021.
(c) Section 4 shall apply as of March 16, 2021.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
Sec. 7. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2